Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-619
Improvement districts; creation; notice.

For every improvement district within which any of the improvements are to be funded by a levy of special assessments on the property especially benefited, after the passage, approval, and publication of an ordinance creating such district, the city clerk shall publish notice of the creation of any such district or districts one time each week for not less than twenty days in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the city.

Laws 1915, c. 86, § 1, p. 225;

Laws 1917, c. 95, § 1, p. 254;

C.S.1922, § 4084;

Laws 1925, c. 50, § 1, p. 192;

C.S.1929, § 16-613;

Laws 1933, c. 27, § 1, p. 202;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-613;

R.S.1943, § 16-619;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 86;

Laws 2025, LB90, § 4.

Attack on sufficiency of paving petition could be made by error proceedings. Elliott v. City of Auburn, 172 Neb. 1, 108 N.W.2d 328 (1961).

Publication of notice is a mandatory and jurisdictional step. Danielson v. City of Bellevue, 167 Neb. 809, 95 N.W.2d 57 (1959).